src/fst/orthography/initlowercase.regex
A (->) a, B (->) b, c (->) c, D (->) d, E (->) e, F (->) f, G (->) g,
H (->) h, I (->) i, j (->) j, K (->) k, L (->) l, M (->) m, N (->) n,
O (->) o, P (->) p, q (->) q, R (->) r, S (->) s, T (->) t, U (->) u,
V (->) v, W (->) w, x (->) x, Y (->) y, Z (->) z || .#. _ ;
